Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB365.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 260.550 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No person shall buy, sell, trade, traffic, or process eggs in Kentucky without a
license issued pursuant to the egg marketing law, with the following exceptions:
(a) Hatcheries purchasing eggs to be used exclusively for hatching purposes;
(b) Hotels, restaurants, and other eating places where all eggs purchased are
served in the establishment;
(c) Bakeries, confectioneries, and ice cream manufacturers who use eggs in a
manufactured product;
(d) Consumers buying eggs for their own consumption; or
(e) Producers who sell only directly to consumers and do not exceed a sales limit
of two hundred forty (240)[sixty (60)] dozen eggs per calendar week.
(2) Any person engaged in the act of selling shell eggs or egg products under any of the
following circumstances shall have all shell eggs and egg products placed under a
stop order:
(a) Selling or otherwise marketing shell eggs or egg products without a license;
(b) Selling or otherwise marketing shell eggs or egg products without first
submitting an emergency recall plan to the department; or
(c) Failing to remit or pay fines owed to the department.
(3) Any person engaged in the act of selling or otherwise marketing shell eggs under
the following conditions shall have those eggs placed under a stop order for:
(a) Failing to have the proper labels attached, as required by KRS 260.630; or
(b) Failing to meet the tolerances of consumer grades and consumer grade quality
standards, as required by KRS 260.620.
(4) Any person engaged in the act of selling or otherwise marketing shell eggs or egg
products shall have these shell eggs or egg products placed under a withdraw from
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/5/2025 1:58 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1521
sale order for the following reasons:
(a) Ambient temperature above forty-five (45) degrees Fahrenheit for a period of
four (4) hours or more; or
(b) Contamination or any condition which may render the shell eggs or egg
products unfit for human consumption.
The withdraw from sale order shall remain in effect until such time as the
disposition of the shell eggs or egg products has been determined by the
department.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/5/2025 1:58 PM Jacketed